Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2038YH (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. 485 Section 1. Section 423.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 111. a. The sales price of adaptive 3 driving equipment sold or of adaptive driving equipment 4 installation services furnished, if such equipment and services 5 are sold or furnished for installation in a motor vehicle used 6 primarily by a person unable to drive or be transported without 7 such equipment installed in the motor vehicle. 8 b. As used in this subsection: 9 (1) âAdaptive driving equipmentâ means platform wheelchair 10 lifts, under-vehicle lifts, power door openers, lowered floors, 11 raised roofs, raised doors, hand controls, left foot gas 12 pedals, reduced-effort and zero-effort steering and braking, 13 and digital driving systems. 14 (2) âMotor vehicleâ means the same a defined in section 15 321.1. 16